Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.012

May accept and operate water-sewer district's property when boundaries are identical.

A city or town, whose boundaries are identical with those of a water-sewer district, or within which a water-sewer district is entirely located, which is free from all debts and liabilities except contractual obligations between the district and the town, may accept the property and assets of the district and operate such property and assets as a municipal waterworks, if the district and the city or town each participate in a summary dissolution proceedings for the district as provided in RCW 57.04.110.

[ 1999 c 153 s 39; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.012. Prior: 1955 c 358 s 2. Formerly RCW 80.40.012.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.